Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE
4A]

CREDIT FOR
REINSURANCE

§431:4A-101 Credit allowed a domestic
ceding insurer. (a) Credit for reinsurance shall be allowed a domestic
ceding insurer as either an asset or a reduction from liability on account of
reinsurance ceded only when the reinsurer meets the requirements of subsection
(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f). Credit shall be allowed under subsection (b) or
(c) only as respects cessions of those kinds or classes of business that the
assuming insurer is licensed or otherwise permitted to write or assume in its
state of domicile or, in the case of a United States branch of an alien
assuming insurer, in the state through which it is entered and licensed to
transact insurance or reinsurance. Credit shall be allowed under subsection
(c) or (d) only if the applicable requirements of subsection (g) have been
satisfied.

(b) Credit shall be allowed when the
reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that is licensed to transact
insurance or reinsurance in this State, or is accredited by the commissioner as
a reinsurer in this State. To be eligible for accreditation, a reinsurer
shall:

(1) File with the commissioner evidence of its
submission to this State's jurisdiction;

(2) Submit to this State's authority to examine its
books and records;

(3) Be licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance
in at least one state, or in the case of a United States branch of an alien
assuming insurer, be entered through and licensed to transact insurance or
reinsurance in at least one state;

(4) File annually with the commissioner a copy of its
annual statement filed with the insurance department of its state of domicile
and a copy of its most recent audited financial statement; and

(5) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the
commissioner that it has adequate financial capacity to meet its reinsurance
obligations and is otherwise qualified to assume reinsurance from domestic
insurers. An assuming insurer is deemed to meet this requirement as of the
time of its application if it maintains a surplus as regards policyholders in
an amount not less than $20,000,000 and its accreditation has not been denied
by the commissioner within ninety days after submission of its application.

(c) Credit shall be allowed when the
reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that is domiciled in, or in the
case of a United States branch of an alien assuming insurer is entered through,
a state that employs standards regarding credit for reinsurance equal to or
exceeding those applicable under this article and the assuming insurer or
United States branch of an alien assuming insurer:

(1) Maintains
a surplus as regards policyholders in an amount not less than $20,000,000; and

(2) Submits
to the authority of this State to examine its books and records;

provided that paragraph (1) does not apply to
reinsurance ceded and assumed pursuant to pooling arrangements among insurers
in the same holding company system.

(d) Credit shall be allowed as follows:

(1) Credit
shall be allowed when the reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that
maintains a trust fund in a qualified United States financial institution, as
defined in section 431:4A-103(b), for the payment of the valid claims of its
United States ceding insurers, their assigns and successors in interest. To
enable the commissioner to determine the sufficiency of the trust fund, the
assuming insurer shall report annually to the commissioner information
substantially the same as that required to be reported on the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners' annual statement form by licensed
insurers. The assuming insurer shall submit to examination of its books and
records by the commissioner and bear the expense of examination;

(2) Credit for reinsurance shall not be granted under
this subsection unless the form of the trust and any amendments to the trust
have been approved by:

(A) The commissioner of the state where the
trust is domiciled; or

(B) The commissioner of another state who,
pursuant to the terms of the trust instrument, has accepted principal
regulatory oversight of the trust.

The form of the trust and any trust
amendments shall also be filed with the commissioner of every state in which
the ceding insurer beneficiaries of the trust are domiciled. The trust
instrument shall provide that contested claims shall be valid and enforceable
upon the final order of any court of competent jurisdiction in the United
States.

The trust shall vest legal title to its
assets in its trustees for the benefit of the assuming insurer's United States
ceding insurers, their assigns and successors in interest. The trust and the
assuming insurer shall be subject to examination as determined by the
commissioner.

The trust shall remain in effect for as long
as the assuming insurer has outstanding obligations due under the reinsurance
agreements subject to the trust. No later than February 28 of each year, the
trustee of the trust shall report to the commissioner in writing the balance of
the trust and listing the trust's investments at the preceding year end and
shall certify the date of termination of the trust, if so planned, or certify
that the trust will not expire prior to the following December 31;

(3) The following requirements shall apply to these
categories of assuming insurers:

(A) The trust fund for a single assuming
insurer shall consist of funds in trust in an amount not less than the assuming
insurer's liabilities attributable to reinsurance ceded by United States ceding
insurers, and, in addition, the assuming insurer shall maintain a trusteed
surplus of not less than $20,000,000, except as provided in subparagraph (B);

(B) At any time after the assuming insurer has
permanently discontinued underwriting new business secured by the trust for at
least three full years, the commissioner with principal regulatory oversight of
the trust may authorize a reduction in the required trusteed surplus, but only
after finding, based on an assessment of the risk, that the new required
surplus level is adequate for the protection of United States ceding insurers,
policyholders, and claimants in light of reasonably foreseeable adverse loss
development. The risk assessment may involve an actuarial review, including an
independent analysis of reserves and cash flows, and shall consider all
material risk factors, including when applicable the lines of business
involved, the stability of the incurred loss estimates, and the effect of the
surplus requirements on the assuming insurer's liquidity or solvency. The
minimum required trusteed surplus may not be reduced to an amount less than
thirty per cent of the assuming insurer's liabilities attributable to
reinsurance ceded by United States ceding insurers covered by the trust;

(C) In the case of a group including
incorporated and individual unincorporated underwriters:

(i) For reinsurance ceded under reinsurance
agreements with an inception, amendment, or renewal date on or after January 1,
1993, the trust shall consist of a trusteed account in an amount not less than
the respective underwriters' several liabilities attributable to business ceded
by United States domiciled ceding insurers to any underwriter of the group;

(ii) For reinsurance ceded under reinsurance
agreements with an inception date on or before December 31, 1992, and not
amended or renewed after that date, notwithstanding the other provisions of
this article, the trust shall consist of a trusteed account in an amount not
less than the respective underwriters' several insurance and reinsurance
liabilities attributable to business written in the United States; and

(iii) In addition to these trusts, the group
shall maintain in trust a trusteed surplus of which $100,000,000 shall be held
jointly for the benefit of United States domiciled ceding insurers of any
member of the group for all years of account.

The incorporated members of the group
shall not be engaged in any business other than underwriting as a member of the
group and shall be subject to the same level of regulation and solvency control
by the group's domiciliary regulator as are the unincorporated members.

Within ninety days after its
financial statements are due to be filed with the group's domiciliary
regulator, the group shall provide to the commissioner an annual certification
by the group's domiciliary regulator of the solvency of each underwriter
member; or if a certification is unavailable, financial statements, prepared by
independent public accountants, of each underwriter member of the group;

(D) In the case of a group of incorporated
underwriters under common administration, the group shall:

(i) Have continuously transacted an insurance
business outside the United States for at least three years immediately prior
to making application for accreditation;

(ii) Maintain aggregate policyholders' surplus
of at least $10,000,000,000;

(iii) Maintain a trust fund in an amount not less
than the group's several liabilities attributable to business ceded by United
States domiciled ceding insurers to any member of the group pursuant to
reinsurance contracts issued in the name of such group;

(iv) Maintain a joint trusteed surplus of which
$100,000,000 shall be held jointly for the benefit of United States domiciled
ceding insurers of any member of the group as additional security for these
liabilities; and

(v) Within ninety days after its financial
statements are due to be filed with the group's domiciliary regulator, make
available to the commissioner an annual certification of each underwriter
member's solvency by the member's domiciliary regulator and financial
statements of each underwriter member of the group prepared by its independent
public accountant.

(e) Credit shall be allowed when the
reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that has been certified by the
commissioner as a reinsurer in this State and secures its obligations in
accordance with the requirements of this subsection as follows:

(1) To be eligible for certification, the assuming
insurer shall:

(A) Be domiciled and licensed to transact
insurance or reinsurance in a qualified jurisdiction, as determined by the
commissioner pursuant to paragraph (3);

(B) Maintain minimum capital and surplus, or
its equivalent, in an amount to be determined by the rules adopted by the
commissioner;

(C) Maintain financial strength ratings from
two or more rating agencies deemed acceptable by the rules adopted by the
commissioner;

(D) Agree to submit to the jurisdiction of
this State, appoint the commissioner as its agent for service of process in
this State, and agree to provide security for one hundred per cent of the
assuming insurer's liabilities attributable to reinsurance ceded by United
States ceding insurers if the assuming insurer resists enforcement of a final
United States judgment;

(E) Agree to meet applicable information
filing requirements as determined by the commissioner, both with respect to an
initial application for certification and on an ongoing basis; and

(F) Satisfy any other requirements for
certification deemed relevant by the commissioner;

(2) An association including incorporated and individual
unincorporated underwriters may be a certified reinsurer. To be eligible for
certification, in addition to satisfying the requirements of paragraph (1):

(A) The association shall satisfy its minimum
capital and surplus requirements through the capital and surplus equivalents
(net of liabilities) of the association and its members, which shall include a
joint central fund that may be applied to any unsatisfied obligation of the
association or any of its members, in an amount determined by the commissioner
to provide adequate protection;

(B) The incorporated members of the
association shall not be engaged in any business other than underwriting as a
member of the association and shall be subject to the same level of regulation
and solvency control by the association's domiciliary regulator as are the
unincorporated members; and

(C) Within ninety days after its financial
statements are due to be filed with the association's domiciliary regulator,
the association shall provide to the commissioner an annual certification by
the association's domiciliary regulator of the solvency of each underwriter
member; or if a certification is unavailable, financial statements, prepared by
independent public accountants, of each underwriter member of the association;

(3) The commissioner shall create and publish a list
of qualified jurisdictions under which an assuming insurer licensed and
domiciled in a qualified jurisdiction is eligible to be considered for
certification by the commissioner as a certified reinsurer. In addition:

(A) To determine whether the domiciliary
jurisdiction of a non-United States assuming insurer is eligible to be
recognized as a qualified jurisdiction, the commissioner shall evaluate the
appropriateness and effectiveness of the reinsurance supervisory system of the
jurisdiction, both initially and on an ongoing basis, and consider the rights,
benefits, and the extent of reciprocal recognition afforded by the non-United
States jurisdiction to reinsurers licensed and domiciled in the United States.
A qualified jurisdiction shall agree to share information and cooperate with
the commissioner with respect to all certified reinsurers domiciled within that
jurisdiction. A jurisdiction may not be recognized as a qualified jurisdiction
if the commissioner has determined that the jurisdiction does not adequately
and promptly enforce final United States judgments and arbitration awards.
Additional factors may be considered in the discretion of the commissioner;

(B) A list of qualified jurisdictions shall be
published through the National Association of Insurance Commissioners committee
process. The commissioner shall consider this list in determining qualified
jurisdictions. If the commissioner approves a jurisdiction as qualified that
does not appear on the list of qualified jurisdictions, the commissioner shall
provide thoroughly documented justification in accordance with criteria to be
developed under rules adopted by the commissioner;

(C) United States jurisdictions that meet the
requirement for accreditation under the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners financial regulation standards and accreditation program shall be
recognized as qualified jurisdictions; and

(D) If a certified reinsurer's domiciliary
jurisdiction ceases to be a qualified jurisdiction, the commissioner has the
discretion to suspend the reinsurer's certification indefinitely, in lieu of
revocation;

(4) The commissioner shall assign a rating to each
certified reinsurer, giving due consideration to the financial strength ratings
that have been assigned by rating agencies deemed acceptable pursuant to rules
adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner shall publish a list of all
certified reinsurers and their ratings;

(5) A certified reinsurer shall secure obligations
assumed from United States ceding insurers under this subsection at a level
consistent with its rating, as specified in rules adopted by the commissioner.
In addition:

(A) In order for a domestic ceding insurer to
qualify for full financial statement credit for reinsurance ceded to a
certified reinsurer, the certified reinsurer shall maintain security in a form
acceptable to the commissioner and consistent with section 431:4A-102, or in a
multibeneficiary trust in accordance with subsection (d), except as otherwise
provided in this subsection;

(B) If a certified reinsurer maintains a trust
to fully secure its obligations subject to subsection (d), and chooses to
secure its obligations incurred as a certified reinsurer in the form of a
multibeneficiary trust, the certified reinsurer shall maintain separate trust
accounts for its obligations incurred under reinsurance agreements issued or
renewed as a certified reinsurer with reduced security as permitted by this
subsection or comparable laws of other United States jurisdictions and for its
obligations subject to subsection (d). It shall be a condition to the grant of
certification under this subsection that the certified reinsurer shall have
bound itself, by the language of the trust and agreement with the commissioner
with principal regulatory oversight of each such trust account, to fund, upon
termination of any such trust account, out of the remaining surplus of such
trust any deficiency of any other such trust account;

(C) The minimum trusteed surplus requirements
provided in subsection (d) shall not be applicable with respect to a
multibeneficiary trust maintained by a certified reinsurer for the purpose of
securing obligations incurred under this subsection, except that such trust
shall maintain a minimum trusteed surplus of $10,000,000;

(D) With respect to obligations incurred by a
certified reinsurer under this subsection, if the security is insufficient, the
commissioner shall reduce the allowable credit by an amount proportionate to
the deficiency, and has the discretion to impose further reductions in
allowable credit upon finding that there is a material risk that the certified
reinsurer's obligations will not be paid in full when due; and

(E) For purposes of this subsection:

(i) A certified reinsurer whose certification
has been terminated for any reason shall be treated as a certified reinsurer
required to secure one hundred per cent of its obligations;

(ii) "Terminated" means revoked,
suspended, voluntarily surrendered, or placed on inactive status; and

(iii) If the commissioner continues to assign a
higher rating as permitted by other provisions of this section, this
requirement shall not apply to a certified reinsurer in inactive status or to a
reinsurer whose certification has been suspended;

(6) If an applicant for certification has been
certified as a reinsurer in a National Association of Insurance Commissioners
accredited jurisdiction, the commissioner has the discretion to defer to that
jurisdiction's certification, and has the discretion to defer to the rating
assigned by that jurisdiction, and such assuming insurer shall be considered to
be a certified reinsurer in this State; and

(7) A certified reinsurer that ceases to assume new
business in this State may request to maintain its certification in inactive
status to continue to qualify for a reduction in security for its in-force
business. An inactive certified reinsurer shall continue to comply with all
applicable requirements of this subsection, and the commissioner shall assign a
rating that takes into account, if relevant, the reasons why the reinsurer is
not assuming new business.

(f) Credit shall be allowed when the
reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer not meeting the requirements of
subsection (b), (c), (d), or (e), but only with respect to the insurance of
risks located in jurisdictions where the reinsurance is required by applicable
law or regulation of that jurisdiction.

(g) If the assuming insurer is not licensed,
accredited, or certified to transact insurance or reinsurance in this State,
the credit permitted by subsections (c) and (d) shall not be allowed unless the
assuming insurer agrees in the reinsurance agreements:

(1) That in the event of the failure of the assuming
insurer to perform its obligations under the terms of the reinsurance
agreement, the assuming insurer, at the request of the ceding insurer, shall
submit to the jurisdiction of any court of competent jurisdiction in any state
of the United States, shall comply with all requirements necessary to give the
court jurisdiction, and shall abide by the final decision of that court or of
any appellate court in the event of an appeal; and

(2) To designate the commissioner or a designated
attorney as its true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served any lawful
process in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of the
ceding insurer.

This subsection is not intended to conflict with or
override the obligation of the parties to a reinsurance agreement to arbitrate
their disputes, if this obligation is created in the agreement.

(h) If the assuming insurer does not meet the
requirements of subsection (b) or (c), the credit permitted by subsection (d)
or (e) shall not be allowed unless the assuming insurer agrees in the trust
agreements to the following conditions:

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions in the trust
instrument to the contrary, if the trust fund is inadequate because it contains
an amount less than the amount required by subsection (d)(3), or if the grantor
of the trust has been declared insolvent or placed into receivership,
rehabilitation, liquidation, or similar proceedings under the laws of its state
or country of domicile, the trustee shall comply with an order of the
commissioner with regulatory oversight over the trust or with an order of any
court of competent jurisdiction in any state of the United States directing the
trustee to transfer to the commissioner with regulatory oversight all of the
assets of the trust fund;

(2) The assets shall be distributed by and claims
shall be filed with and valued by the commissioner with regulatory oversight in
accordance with the laws of the state in which the trust is domiciled that are
applicable to the liquidation of domestic insurance companies;

(3) If the commissioner with regulatory oversight
determines that the assets of the trust fund or any part thereof are not
necessary to satisfy the claims of the United States ceding insurers of the
grantor of the trust, the assets or part thereof shall be returned by the
commissioner with regulatory oversight to the trustee for distribution in
accordance with the trust agreement; and

(4) The grantor shall waive any right otherwise
available to it under United States law that is inconsistent with this subsection.

(i) If an accredited or certified reinsurer
ceases to meet the requirements for accreditation or certification, the
commissioner may suspend or revoke the reinsurer's accreditation or
certification. In addition:

(1) The commissioner shall give the reinsurer notice
and opportunity for hearing. The suspension or revocation may not take effect
until after the commissioner's order after a hearing, unless:

(A) The reinsurer waives its right to a
hearing;

(B) The commissioner's order is based on regulatory
action by the reinsurer's domiciliary jurisdiction or the voluntary surrender
or termination of the reinsurer's eligibility to transact insurance or
reinsurance business in its domiciliary jurisdiction or in the primary
certifying state of the reinsurer under subsection (e)(6); or

(C) The commissioner finds that an emergency
requires immediate action and a court of competent jurisdiction has not stayed
the commissioner's action.

(2) While a reinsurer's accreditation or
certification is suspended, no reinsurance contract issued or renewed after the
effective date of the suspension qualifies for credit except to the extent that
the reinsurer's obligations under the contract are secured in accordance with
section 431:4A-102. If a reinsurer's accreditation or certification is
revoked, no credit for reinsurance may be granted after the effective date of
the revocation except to the extent that the reinsurer's obligations under the
contract are secured in accordance with subsection (e)(5) or section 431:4A-102.

(j) A ceding insurer shall take steps to:

(1) Manage its reinsurance recoverables proportionate
to its own book of business. A domestic ceding insurer shall notify the
commissioner within thirty days after reinsurance recoverables from any single
assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, exceed fifty per
cent of the domestic ceding insurer's last reported surplus to policyholders,
or after it is determined that reinsurance recoverables from any single
assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, are likely to
exceed this limit. The notification shall demonstrate that the exposure is
safely managed by the domestic ceding insurer; and

(2) Diversify its reinsurance program. A domestic
ceding insurer shall notify the commissioner within thirty days after ceding to
any single assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, more
than twenty per cent of the ceding insurer's gross written premium in the prior
calendar year, or after it has determined that the reinsurance ceded to any
single assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, is likely to
exceed this limit. The notification shall demonstrate that the exposure is
safely managed by the domestic ceding insurer. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §5; am L
1993, c 321, §11; am L 1994, c 34, §1; am L 2014, c 234, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next